Utah statutes.
31A-7-104.   General corporate powers and procedures.

(1)  Corporations organized or operating under this chapter have the powers specified under Section 31A-5-104.

(2)  Subject to the limitations upon subsidiary investment valuation otherwise stated under this title, corporations organized or operating under this chapter may invest in corporations organized for profit.

(3)  Corporations subject to the provisions of this chapter may enter into contracts for the rendering of hospital services, medical-surgical services, and other health services on behalf of any of their subscribers with hospitals maintained by the state, or by any of its political subdivisions, or maintained by a nonprofit corporation organized for hospital purposes, or with other corporations, associations, partnerships, or individuals furnishing hospital services, medical-surgical services, or other health services. This chapter does not require any corporation to contract or remain under contract with any individual, hospital, physician, or other provider of health services.



Amended by Chapter 91, 1987 General Session

